zh-CN: 鱼钩类型: 辅助钩; 有倒刺; 无倒刺; 鹿尾假饵钩; 双钩; 带羽三锚钩; 无钩; 单钩; 三本钩; 防挂底钩; 其他
cs: Typ rybářského háčku: Assist háček; S protihrotem; Bez protihrotu; S peřím (bucktail); Dvojháček; Trojháček s peřím; Bez háčku; Jednoháček; Trojháček; S ochranou proti uváznutí; Jiné
ko: 낚시 후크 유형: 어시스트; 미늘 있음; 미늘 없음; 벅테일 티저; 더블; 페더 트레블; 바늘 없음; 싱글; 트레블; 위드리스; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta ribiškega trnka: Assist; Z zalustjo; Brez zalusti; Bucktail teaser; Dvojni; Pernati trojček; Brez trnka; Enojni; Trojček; Zaščiten proti zatikanju; Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul cârligului de pescuit: Assist; Cu spin; Fără spin; Teaser bucktail; Dublu; Ancoră cu pene; Fără cârlig; Simplu; Ancoră; Antibrădiș; Altele
it: Tipo di amo da pesca: Assist; Con ardiglione; Senza ardiglione; Bucktail teaser; Doppio; Ancoretta piumata; Senza amo; Singolo; Ancoretta; Antialga; Altro
de: Angelhakentyp: Assist; Mit Widerhaken; Ohne Widerhaken; Bucktail-Teaser; Zwillingshaken; Feder-Drilling; Ohne Haken; Einzelhaken; Drilling; Weedless; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta ribarske udice: Assist; S povratnim zarezom; Bez povratnog zareza; Bucktail varalica; Dvostruka; Trostruka s perjem; Bez udice; Jednostruka; Trostruka; Zaštićena od trave; Ostalo
es: Tipo de anzuelo: Asistencia; Con rebaba; Sin rebaba; Teaser tipo bucktail; Doble; Triple con plumas; Sin anzuelo; Sencillo; Triple; Antialgas; Otro
sk-SK: Typ rybárskeho háčika: Asistenčný; S protihrotom; Bez protihrotu; S umelou muškou (Bucktail); Dvojitý; Trojitý s pierkami; Bez háčika; Jednoduchý; Trojitý; S ochranou proti viaznutiu; Iné
nb: Fiskekrok-type: Assist; Med mothake; Uten mothake; Bucktail teaser; Dobbelkrok; Treblekrok med fjær; Uten krok; Enkelkrok; Treblekrok; Gressfri; Annet
fi: Kalastuskoukun tyyppi: Assist; Väkäsellinen; Väkäsetön; Bucktail-teaseri; Kaksihaarakoukku (Double); Höyhennetty kolmihaarakoukku; Ei koukkua; Yksihaarakoukku (Single); Kolmihaarakoukku (Treble); Ruohosuojattu (Weedless); Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de anzol: Assist; Com farpa; Sem farpa; Bucktail teaser; Duplo; Garateia com pena; Sem anzol; Simples; Garateia; Antienrosco; Outros
da: Fiskekrogstype: Assist; Med modhager; Uden modhager; Bucktail-teaser; Dobbelt; Fjerbeklædt trekrog; Ingen krog; Enkeltkrog; Trekrog; Weedless; Andet
pl: Typ haczyka do łowienia ryb: Assist; Z zadziorem; Bezzadziorowy; Z chwostem; Kotwiczka podwójna; Kotwiczka z piórami; Bez haczyka; Haczyk pojedynczy; Kotwiczka; Antyzaczepowy; Inny
th: ประเภทของเบ็ดตกปลา: Assist; มีเงี่ยง; ไม่มีเงี่ยง; บั๊กเทลทีเซอร์; ตะขอคู่; ตะขอสามทางติดขนนก; ไม่มีตะขอ; ตะขอเดี่ยว; ตะขอสามทาง; กันสวะ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type d'hameçon: Assist; Avec ardillon; Sans ardillon; Bucktail teaser; Double; Triple à plumes; Sans hameçon; Simple; Triple; Anti-herbe; Autre
el: Τύπος αγκιστριού ψαρέματος: Assist; Με αρπάδι; Χωρίς αρπάδι; Bucktail teaser; Διπλό; Σαλαγκιά με φτερό; Χωρίς αγκίστρι; Μονό; Σαλαγκιά; Κατά των σκαλωμάτων (weedless); Άλλο
lt-LT: Žvejybos kabliuko tipas: Pagalbinis; Su užkarpėle; Be užkarpėlės; Pūkuotas vilioklis („Bucktail“); Dvigubas; Trigubas su plunksnomis; Be kabliuko; Viengubas; Trigubas; Apsaugotas nuo žolių; Kita
zh-TW: 魚鉤類型: 輔助鉤; 倒刺; 無倒刺; 鹿毛誘餌鉤; 雙鉤; 帶羽毛三叉鉤; 無鉤; 單鉤; 三叉鉤; 防纏鉤; 其他
ru: Тип рыболовного крючка: Ассист; С бородкой; Без бородки; С бактейлом; Двойной; Тройной с оперением; Без крючка; Одинарный; Тройной; Незацепляйка; Другое
vi: Loại lưỡi câu: Trợ lực; Có ngạnh; Không ngạnh; Lưỡi câu bucktail teaser; Lưỡi câu đôi; Lưỡi câu ba có lông vũ; Không có lưỡi câu; Lưỡi câu đơn; Lưỡi câu ba; Chống vướng cỏ; Khác
hu: Horgászhorog típusa: Assist horog; Szakállas; Szakáll nélküli; Műlegyes csali (Bucktail teaser); Dupla horog; Tollas hármashorog; Horog nélküli; Egyágú horog; Hármashorog; Akadásmentes (weedless); Egyéb
tr: Olta iğnesi tipi: Asist; Damaklı; Damaksız; Bucktail iğne; Çiftli; Tüylü üçlü; İğnesiz; Tekli; Üçlü; Ot korumalı; Diğer
ja: 釣り針タイプ: アシスト; バーブド; バーブレス; バックテールティーザー; ダブル; フェザー付きトレブル; フックなし; シングル; トレブル; ウィードレス; その他
en: Fishing hook type: Assist; Barbed; Barbless; Bucktail teaser; Double; Feathered treble; No hook; Single; Treble; Weedless; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de anzol: Assist; Com farpa; Sem farpa; Bucktail teaser; Duplo; Triplo com penas; Sem anzol; Simples; Triplo; Antialgas; Outro
nl: Vishaaktype: Assist; Met weerhaak; Weerhaakloos; Bucktail-teaser; Dubbel; Gevederde dreg; Geen haak; Enkel; Dreg; Weedless; Overige
sv: Typ av krok: Assist; Med hulling; Hullingslös; Bucktail teaser; Dubbelkrok; Fjädrad trekrok; Ingen krok; Enkelkrok; Trekrok; Vasskyddad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип на куката за риболов: Асист; С контра; Без контра; Бъгтейл тийзър; Двойна; Тройна с пера; Без кука; Единична; Тройна; Против закачане; Друго